Utah statutes.
32A-11-101 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Commission's power to issue licenses.

(1) (a)  The commission may issue beer wholesaling licenses for the import, purchase, storage, sale, and distribution of beer.

(b)  The license entitles the licensee to:

(i)  purchase and import beer into the state;

(ii)  store beer in approved warehouses; and

(iii)  sell and distribute beer directly to:

(A)  a licensed beer retailer;

(B)  a holder of a single event permit issued by the commission pursuant to Chapter 7, Single Event Permits; and

(C)  a holder of a temporary retail beer permit issued by the commission for a temporary special event pursuant to Chapter 10, Part 3, Temporary Special Event Beer Permits.

(2) (a)  A person may not import, purchase, store, sell, or distribute beer to retailers or act in any way as a beer wholesaler unless the person has been issued a beer wholesaler's license by the commission.

(b)  Nothing in this section precludes a small brewer from selling beer it has manufactured directly to a licensed beer retailer.

(c)  Violation of this subsection is a class A misdemeanor.

(3)  The commission may prescribe by policy, directive, or rule, consistent with this title, the general operational requirements of wholesaling licensees relating to physical facilities, conditions of purchase, storage, sale, importation, distribution, or transportation of beer within the state.

